Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2103
Nebraska state chartered bank; powers.

(1) A Nebraska state
chartered bank may establish and maintain a branch or acquire a branch in
any other state with the prior approval of the director and upon payment of
the branch application fee set forth in section 8-602.

(2) A Nebraska state chartered
bank may engage in an interstate merger transaction in any other state in which it is the resulting bank and
establish one or more branches in such other state with the prior approval
of the director and upon payment
of the merger and branch application fees set forth in section 8-602.

(3) A Nebraska state chartered
bank may conduct any activities at any branch outside the State of Nebraska
that are permissible under
the laws of the host state where the branch is located or of the United States.

Laws 1997, LB 351, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 16.